Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2389YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 553 Section 1. Section 298.4, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. To pay the costs of employing, or 3 retaining the services of, any of the following: 4 (1) A school resource officer as defined in 34 U.S.C. 5 Â§10389. 6 (2) An individual employed by a private security business 7 who possesses a permit to carry weapons issued under section 8 724.6. For purposes of this subparagraph, âprivate security 9 businessâ means the same as defined in section 80A.1. 10 (3) A reserve peace officer as defined in section 80D.1A. 11 (4) A peace officer as defined in section 801.4. 12 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school budget 13 years beginning on or after July 1, 2025. 14